Hawaii statutes.
[D.] Independent Audit Committee

[§304A-321] Independent
audit committee; established; powers; duties. (a) There is established
within the board of regents of the University of Hawaii an advisory body to be
known as the independent audit committee.

(b) The independent audit committee shall
consist of at least three members but not more than five members who shall be
appointed by the chairperson of the board of regents, from among the members of
the board of regents, except as provided in this subsection. The chair of the
independent audit committee shall be selected by and from among its members.

The independent audit committee shall include
one or more individuals with financial expertise. If no member of the board of
regents has the requisite skills, the board of regents shall execute other
arrangements, which may include the appointment of members of the general
public who possess the requisite financial expertise to the independent audit
committee to ensure that the independent audit committee has the capacity to
carry out its duties.

(c) The board of regents shall generally:

(1) Establish the charter of the independent audit
committee and set forth its members' roles and responsibilities;

(2) Consider changes to the independent audit committee's
charter that are necessary in response to new laws, regulations, and best
practices; and

(3) Conduct an annual review of the independent audit
committee's charter to reassess its adequacy and adopt any proposed and
necessary changes to the charter.

(d) The
independent audit committee shall be exempt from chapter 91 and part I of
chapter 92 to the extent that the independent audit committee is engaging in
discussions or proceedings arising from an investigation by the independent
audit committee relating to potentially actionable civil or criminal conduct,
whether or not the investigation is pending or outstanding.

(e) The independent audit committee shall
undertake professional development to improve the financial expertise of the
independent audit committee as a whole, including:

(1) Attendance at seminars and conferences;

(2) Attendance at educational sessions including
special speakers; and

(3) The study of analytical tools for audit
committees.

(f) The independent audit committee shall engage
in operations relating to enterprise risk management including:

(1) Providing oversight of risk management, which
shall include determining overall strategy and influencing the university's
risk philosophy;

(2) Inquiring of the president of the University of
Hawaii, the chief financial officer of the university, and external auditors
about significant risks or exposures faced by the university;

(3) Assessing steps that the president of the
University of Hawaii has taken or proposes to take to minimize those risks to
the university and periodically reviewing compliance with those steps; and

(4) Reviewing with the general counsel of the
University of Hawaii, external auditors, external counsel, and the chief
financial officer of the university legal and regulatory matters that, in the
opinion of the president of the University of Hawaii, may have a material
impact upon the financial statements, related organization compliance policies,
and programs and reports received from regulators.

(g) The independent audit committee shall hold
meetings as needed to address matters on its agenda, not less frequently than
twice per year. The independent audit committee may request the president of
the University of Hawaii or others to attend its meetings or to provide
pertinent information as necessary. The board of regents shall provide in the
charter of the independent audit committee for the independent audit committee
to take action between meetings by unanimous consent.

(h) The independent audit committee shall
review its effectiveness annually and shall prepare, or oversee the preparation
of, an annual report to the board of regents.

(i) The annual report of the independent audit
committee shall address other matters affecting the management and organization
of the University of Hawaii by engaging in functions, including:

(1) Reviewing with the president of the University of
Hawaii and an external auditor retained pursuant to subsection (r) the effect
of any regulatory and accounting initiatives and unique transactions, including
relationships with legally separate entities, to determine whether the
accounting for those transactions applied best practices;

(2) Reviewing significant related party transactions;

(3) Reviewing with the president of the University of
Hawaii and the chief financial officer of the university, any interim financial
reports or reports on internal control issued with respect to the university
since the last meeting of the independent audit committee; and

(4) Reviewing with an external auditor who performs
an audit the following:

(A) All critical accounting policies and
practices used by the external auditor; provided that:

(i) All alternative treatments of financial
information within generally accepted accounting principles have been discussed
with the president of the University of Hawaii;

(ii) The ramifications of each alternative are
discussed; and

(iii) The treatment preferred by the university
is discussed;

(B) Any consultation with audit firms other
than the external auditor, including the reasons for, and results of, the
consultation; and

(C) Any other information relating to
significant estimates and judgments.

(j) The independent audit committee shall also
review with any external auditor and the chief financial officer of the
university matters affecting internal control and an internal audit, including:

(1) The adequacy of the University of Hawaii's
internal control, including computerized information system controls and
security; and

(2) Any related significant findings and
recommendations of the internal and external auditors, together with the
responses of the president of the University of Hawaii.

(k) The independent audit committee shall also
review matters affecting the accounting policies and procedures of the
University of Hawaii by:

(1) Ensuring that accounting policies, procedures,
and related controls are documented and reviewed with the independent audit
committee;

(2) Reviewing accounting controls annually;

(3) Reviewing with the president of the University of
Hawaii policies and procedures with respect to officers, key employees, and
disqualified persons as defined under section 4958 of the Internal Revenue Code
of 1986, as amended; and

(4) Inquiring of the president of the University of
Hawaii and the chief financial officer regarding the financial health of the
university.

(l) The independent audit committee shall
review the University of Hawaii's antifraud programs and controls and aid in
discovering and remedying incidences of fraud.

(m) Notwithstanding part V of chapter 378, the
independent audit committee shall review:

(1) Procedures for the receipt, retention, and
treatment of complaints received by the University of Hawaii regarding
accounting, internal accounting controls, auditing matters, or suspected fraud
that may be submitted by any party internal or external to the university; and

(2) As the independent audit committee deems
necessary, complaints that may have been received, the current status of such
complaints, and the resolution of such complaints, if any resolution has been
reached;

provided that any person who makes a complaint
covered by this section shall be accorded the same protections as under part V
of chapter 378.

(n) With regard to internal control and any
internal audit, the independent audit committee shall also:

(1) Review with any external auditor, the chief
financial officer of the university, and the comptroller the audit scope and
plan of the internal auditors;

(2) Address the coordination of audit efforts to
ensure the completeness of coverage, reduction of redundant efforts, and the
effective use of audit resources; and

(3) Discuss with the chief financial officer of the
university and the external auditor opportunities for reliance by the external
auditor on the audit activities of any internal audit.

(o) For internal audits, the independent audit
committee shall review the following with the president of the University of
Hawaii and the chief financial officer of the university:

(1) Significant findings of internal audits conducted
during the university's previous and current fiscal year and the president's
responses;

(2) Whether internal auditors have encountered
difficulties in discharging their responsibilities in the course of their audits,
such as any restrictions on the scope of their work or access to required
information;

(3) Any changes required in the scope of internal
audits;

(4) The budget and staffing of internal audit
operations;

(5) An audit plan to govern internal audits; and

(6) The compliance of internal audits with the
Institute of Internal Auditors' International Standards for the Professional
Practice of Internal Auditing.

(p) Internal auditors shall meet separately
with any external auditor to coordinate audit plans to optimize the ability of
the external auditor to rely upon the results of the internal audit team.

(q) The independent audit committee shall
annually evaluate the performance of any internal audit, including:

(1) The adequacy of the audit plan;

(2) The management of the execution of the audit
plan;

(3) The adequacy of human and other resources
available to execute the audit plan;

(4) The ability of any external auditor to rely upon
the internal audit work product in the annual audit performed by an external
auditor retained pursuant to subsection (r); and

(5) The nature of the findings or results of any
internal audits.

(r) Subject to approval by the board of
regents, the independent audit committee shall select one or more external
auditors to be retained by the University of Hawaii. The independent audit
committee shall:

(1) Approve an audit plan;

(2) Establish the audit fees of any external auditor;

(3) Pre-approve any non-audit services provided by
the external auditor, including tax services, before such services are
rendered;

(4) Review with the president of the University of
Hawaii the significance of contracting out audit services; and

(5) Ensure that single audit obligations are
incorporated into an annual audit plan.

(s) The independent audit committee shall
review all material written communications between any external auditor and the
president of the University of Hawaii, including any management letter or
schedule of unadjusted differences.

(t) The independent audit committee shall
annually evaluate any external auditor; provided that communications with the
external auditor in the evaluation shall be done so as to maintain the open
flow of communication between the external auditor and the independent audit
committee.

(u) The independent audit committee shall
review the following matters relating to any annual audit with the president of
the University of Hawaii and any external auditor:

(1) The university's annual financial statements and
related footnotes;

(2) The external auditor's audit of the financial
statements and the external auditor's report;

(3) The external auditor's judgments about the
quality of the university's accounting principles as applied in the
university's financial reporting;

(4) Any significant changes required in the external
auditor's audit plan;

(5) Any serious difficulties or disputes with the
president of the University of Hawaii encountered during the audit; and

(6) Matters to be discussed by the Statement on
Auditing Standards No. 114, The Auditor's Communication with those Charged with
Governance (AICPA, Professional Standards), related to the conduct of any
annual audit.

(v) The independent audit committee may hire
external auditors, legal counsel, or other consultants as necessary, to address
any issues arising from:

(1) The execution of the whistleblower protection
procedures subject to subsection (m);

(2) Any statutory or contractual procedures when
engaging external resources; and

(3) The detection of fraud.

(w) The independent audit committee shall
submit an annual report to the board of regents and the legislature no later
than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session of the
legislature on matters that include the following:

(1) All instances of material weakness in internal
control, including the responses of university management; and

(2) All instances of fraud, including the responses
of university management. [L 2013, c 87, §5]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next